New York, session 2025-2026, A5201.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act enacts into law components of legislation relating 2 to the metropolitan transportation authority. Each component is wholly 3 contained within a Part identified as Parts A through B. The effective 4 date for each particular provision contained within such Part as set 5 forth in the last section of such Part. Any provision in any section 6 contained within a Part, including the effective date of the Part, which 7 makes a reference to a section "of this act", when used in connection 8 with that particular component, shall be deemed to mean and refer to the 9 corresponding section of the Part in which it is found. Section three of 10 this act sets forth the general effective date of this act. 11 PART A 12 Section 1. Article 44-C of the vehicle and traffic law is REPEALED. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08982-01-5 A. 5201 2 1 § 2. Subdivision 4 of section 1630 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 2 amended by section 2 of subpart A of part ZZZ of chapter 59 of the laws 3 of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 4 4. Charging of tolls, taxes, fees, licenses or permits for the use of 5 the highway or any of its parts [or entry into or remaining within the 6 central business district established by article forty-four-C of this 7 chapter], where the imposition thereof is authorized by law. 8 § 3. Paragraph (s) of subdivision 9 of section 553 of the public 9 authorities law is REPEALED. 10 § 4. Subdivision 12-a of section 553 of the public authorities law is 11 REPEALED. 12 § 5. Section 553-j of the public authorities law is REPEALED. 13 § 6. Paragraph (p) of subdivision 2 of section 87 of the public offi- 14 cers law is REPEALED. 15 § 7. Section 553-k of the public authorities law is REPEALED. 16 § 8. Sections 9, 10 and 11 of subpart A of part ZZZ of chapter 59 of 17 the laws of 2019, amending the vehicle and traffic law and the public 18 authorities law relating to establishing a central business district 19 tolling program in the city of New York and amending the public officers 20 law relating to confidentiality of certain public records, are REPEALED. 21 § 9. Section 566-a of the public authorities law, as amended by 22 section 12 of subpart A of part ZZZ of chapter 59 of the laws of 2019, 23 is amended to read as follows: 24 § 566-a. Tax contract by the state. 1. It is hereby found, determined 25 and declared that the authority and the carrying out of its corporate 26 purposes is in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state 27 of New York, for the improvement of their health, welfare and prosper- 28 ity, and, in the case of some of the said purposes, for the promotion of 29 their traffic, and that said purposes are public purposes and, in the 30 case of those purposes which consist of vehicular bridges, vehicular 31 tunnels and approaches thereto [and the central business district toll- 32 ing program], the project is an essential part of the public highway 33 system and the authority will be performing an essential governmental 34 function in the exercise of the powers conferred by this title, and the 35 state of New York covenants with the purchasers and with all subsequent 36 holders and transferees of bonds issued after January first, nineteen 37 hundred thirty-nine by the authority pursuant to this title, in consid- 38 eration of the acceptance of any payment for the bonds that the bonds of 39 the authority issued after January first, nineteen hundred thirty-nine 40 pursuant to this title and the income therefrom, and all moneys, funds, 41 tolls and other revenues pledged to pay or secure the payment of such 42 bonds, shall at all times be free from taxation except for estate taxes 43 and taxes on transfers by or in contemplation of death. 44 2. Nothing herein shall be construed to repeal or supersede any tax 45 exemptions heretofore or hereafter granted by general or other laws. 46 § 10. Subsection (jjj) of section 606 of the tax law, as added by 47 section 1 of subpart F of part ZZZ of chapter 59 of the laws of 2019, is 48 REPEALED. 49 § 11. This act shall take effect immediately. 50 PART B 51 Section 1. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new 52 section 1276-g to read as follows: 53 § 1276-g. Infrastructure survey and ADA compliance. 1. For the 54 purposes of this section, "ADA" shall mean the Americans with Disabili- A. 5201 3 1 ties Act, title 42 of the United States code annotated section 12101 et. 2 seq. 3 2. Within ninety days of the effective date of this section, the 4 authority shall establish a committee which shall assess the state of 5 the authority's infrastructure and compliance with the ADA. 6 3. The membership of the committee shall be composed of experts in 7 engineering, urban planning, accessibility, and transportation, repre- 8 sentatives from disability advocacy groups, and community stakeholders. 9 4. The committee shall: 10 (a) conduct a comprehensive survey of all authority-owned and operated 11 infrastructure, including but not limited to subway stations, bus 12 depots, rail yards, and related facilities. Such survey shall identify 13 and prioritize infrastructure requiring immediate repair or replacement 14 due to safety concerns, operational inefficiencies, or other critical 15 issues. Such infrastructure repair projects shall be prioritized based 16 on urgency, the impact of such projects on service delivery, and cost- 17 effectiveness; and 18 (b) conduct a thorough assessment of all authority-owned and operated 19 stations to determine such station's current level of compliance with 20 the ADA. Such assessment shall include, but not be limited to, the eval- 21 uation of station entrances, platforms, signage, communication systems, 22 and auxiliary services for accessibility. Such assessment shall identify 23 and compile a list of stations that require modifications to meet ADA 24 compliance standards and develop a prioritized plan for completing such 25 modifications. 26 5. (a) The authority shall allocate appropriate resources and funding 27 to ensure the completion of the infrastructure repair projects identi- 28 fied and prioritized pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision four of 29 this section. 30 (b) The committee shall estimate the cost of completing seventy-five 31 percent of the station modifications identified and prioritized pursuant 32 to paragraph (b) of subdivision four of this section by two thousand 33 thirty-five, including a timeline and budget for implementation. 34 6. The committee shall hold public hearings and solicit input from 35 transit users, disability advocacy groups, and community organizations 36 to ensure that the needs and concerns of all stakeholders are consid- 37 ered. 38 7. (a) No later than one year after the establishment of the committee 39 pursuant to subdivision two of this section, the authority shall submit 40 a detailed report of the findings of the survey conducted pursuant to 41 subdivision four of this section to the governor and the legislature. 42 Such report shall include, but not be limited to, a timeline and budget 43 for the infrastructure repair projects identified and prioritized pursu- 44 ant to paragraph (b) of subdivision four of this section. 45 (b) Following the submission of the original report pursuant to para- 46 graph (a) of this subdivision, the authority shall submit annual 47 progress reports to the governor and the legislature. Such annual 48 progress reports shall detail advancements made, challenges encountered, 49 and any adjustments to the initial plans for infrastructure repair 50 projects and station modification required pursuant to this section. 51 (c) Regular updates on the progress of the infrastructure repair 52 projects and ADA compliance modifications required pursuant to this 53 section, including copies of the reports required pursuant to paragraphs 54 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, shall be published on the authority's 55 website and through other appropriate channels. A. 5201 4 1 8. The state comptroller's office shall establish an independent over- 2 sight body to monitor the implementation of the committee's recommenda- 3 tions pursuant to this section and ensure adherence to established time- 4 lines, budget allocations, and quality standards. This oversight body 5 shall have the authority to audit, review, and report on the progress of 6 the projects, as needed. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. 8 § 2. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 9 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 10 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 11 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 12 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 13 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 14 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 15 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 16 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 17 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 18 the applicable effective date of Parts A through B of this act shall be 19 as specifically set forth in the last section of such Parts.